Illinois, session 104th, HB2354.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1049.2 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1049.2)7    Sec. 5-1049.2. Lease of county property. 8    (a) The county board may lease real estate acquired or 9held by the county for any term not exceeding 99 years and may 10lease the real estate when, in the opinion of the county board, 11the real estate is no longer necessary, appropriate, required 12for the use of, profitable to, or for the best interests of the 13county. The authority to lease shall be exercised by an 14ordinance passed by three-fourths of the full county board 15then holding office, at any regular meeting or at any special 16meeting called for that purpose.17    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), upon three-fourths 18vote, by the full county board, the county board may lease 19farmland acquired or held by the county for any term not 20exceeding 5 years. Farmland may be leased to either public or 21private entities via a cash lease, crop-sharing arrangement, 22or custom farming arrangement. The bid process for a lease 23entered into under this subsection must be publicly advertised   HB2354- 2 -LRB104 09944 RTM 20014 b1and sealed bids must be opened at a county board meeting for 2public review. Counties shall not acquire farmland for the 3sole purpose of entering into a cash lease, crop-sharing 4arrangement, or custom farming arrangement or other 5speculative purpose.6    (c) The lease of real estate is permitted when a vacant 7property, structure, or facility owned by the county can be 8used in the interest of the public or for the benefit and 9enjoyment of residents of the county. 10(Source: P.A. 103-415, eff. 8-4-23.)